Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 13 Acts or Attempts Resulting in Insolvency or Judicial Seizure of a Company

46-8-360 through 46-8-365.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1892, p. 111, §§ 2-6; Penal Code 1895, §§ 686-690; Penal Code 1910, §§ 735-739; Code 1933, §§ 94-9910 — 94-9914; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 46; repealed by Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 9/SB 285, effective July 1, 2006.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 9/SB 285 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 2006.